Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5010.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER VIII Sec. 21e. (1) It is an affirmative defense in a prosecution for a felony or misdemeanor violation of a law of this state that the defendant committed the offense as a direct result of the defendant being a victim of human trafficking under chapter LXVIIA of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.462a to 750.462h. (2) The defendant bears the burden of proving the defense under subsection (1) by a preponderance of the evidence. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.